Arkansas, session 2025, HB1907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-428(a)(1), concerning the income tax
deduction for depreciation and the expensing of property, is amended to read
as follows:
(a)(1)(A) Title 26 U.S.C. §§ 167 and 168(a)-(j), as in effect on
January 1, 2019, are adopted for the purpose of computing Arkansas income tax
liability for property purchased in tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2014.
(B) Title 26 U.S.C. §§ 167 and 168, as in effect on
January 1, 2025, are adopted for the purpose of computing Arkansas income tax
liability for property purchased in tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2025.
*JLL319*
03/31/2025 9:42:24 AM JLL319

HB1907

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

































03/31/2025 9:42:24 AM JLL319